Colorado, session 2026A, HB1183.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, repeal
(27)(a)(XII); and add (35)(a)(X) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(27) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2026:
(XII) The licensing of pet animal facilities by the commissioner of
agriculture in accordance with article 80 of title 35;
(35) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2034:
(X) THE LICENSING OF PET ANIMAL FACILITIES BY THE
COMMISSIONER OF AGRICULTURE IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 80 OF TITLE
35.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-80-117, amend (1)
as follows:
35-80-117. Repeal of article - sunset review - report to general
assembly.
(1) This article 80 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026
SEPTEMBER 1, 2034.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-80-115, amend (1),
(3), and (4); and add (1.5) and (2.5) as follows:
35-80-115. Advisory committee - repeal.
(1) (a) There is hereby established a pet animal advisory committee
to advise the commissioner in establishing rules under this article 80 and to
provide ongoing review of this article 80. The members of the advisory
committee shall receive no compensation or reimbursement from the state
of Colorado or the department for expenses incurred in the performance of
their duties. The advisory committee shall consist of seventeen persons
appointed by the commissioner as follows:
(a) (I) One person who represents animal rescue;
(b) (II) One person who represents bird breeders;
(c) (III) One person who represents small-scale operation dog
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

breeders;
(d) (IV) One person who represents cat breeders;
(e) (V) One person who represents small animal breeders;
(f) (VI) One person who represents boarding kennels;
(f.5) (VII) One person who represents the "dog day care industry",
which term means premises on which dogs are kept primarily for the
purpose of short-term care;
(g) (VIII) One person who represents pet groomers;
(h) (IX) One person who represents pet animal retailers;
(i) (X) One person who represents pet animal wholesalers;
(j) (XI) One person who represents animal control officers;
(k) (XII) One person who represents animal shelters;
(l) (XIII) One veterinarian licensed pursuant to article 315 of title
12;
(m) (XIV) Three members of the general public, none of whom shall
represent or have a financial interest in any of the groups listed in this
subsection (1); and
(n) (XV) One person who represents large-scale operation dog
breeders.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, ON
JANUARY 1, 2027:
(I) THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE DESCRIBED IN SAID SUBSECTION (1)(a)
IS DISMISSED;
(II) THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE'S AUTHORITY IS REVOKED; AND
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

(III) THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1.5) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL ASSUME THE AUTHORITY OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE
DESCRIBED IN SAID SUBSECTION (1)(a).
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (1) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028.
(1.5) (a) ON JANUARY 1, 2027, THE PET ANIMAL ADVISORY
COMMITTEE IS ESTABLISHED TO ADVISE THE COMMISSIONER IN ESTABLISHING
RULES UNDER THIS ARTICLE 80 AND TO PROVIDE ONGOING REVIEW OF THIS
ARTICLE 80. THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF FIFTEEN INDIVIDUALS
APPOINTED BY THE COMMISSIONER AS FOLLOWS:
(I) TEN INDIVIDUALS, EACH OF WHOM REPRESENTS AT LEAST ONE
DISTINCT CATEGORY OF LICENSE ISSUED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 80;
(II) ONE INDIVIDUAL WHO REPRESENTS ANIMAL CONTROL OFFICERS;
(III) ONE INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A VETERINARIAN LICENSED PURSUANT
TO ARTICLE 315 OF TITLE 12; AND
(IV) THREE INDIVIDUALS WHO DO NOT REPRESENT OR HAVE A
FINANCIAL INTEREST IN ANY OF THE GROUPS LISTED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(1.5).
(b) (I) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL
APPOINT THE INITIAL MEMBERS OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE. EACH INITIAL
MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF
FOUR YEARS; EXCEPT THAT:
(A) TWO OF THE INITIAL MEMBERS APPOINTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1.5)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF
THREE YEARS;
(B) TWO OF THE INITIAL MEMBERS APPOINTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1.5)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF
TWO YEARS;
(C) ONE OF THE INITIAL MEMBERS APPOINTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1.5)(a)(IV) OF THIS SECTION SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF
THREE YEARS; AND
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

(D) ONE OF THE INITIAL MEMBERS APPOINTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1.5)(a)(IV) OF THIS SECTION SHALL SERVE AN INITIAL TERM OF
TWO YEARS.
(II) (A) THE COMMISSIONER, AT THE COMMISSIONER'S DISCRETION,
MAY APPOINT A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION TO THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE DESCRIBED
IN THIS SUBSECTION (1.5).
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (1.5)(b)(II) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY
1, 2028.
(III) AFTER THE INITIAL MEMBERS OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE
COMPLETE THEIR INITIAL TERMS, EACH MEMBER APPOINTED TO THE
ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL SERVE A TERM OF FOUR YEARS; EXCEPT THAT
AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL NOT SERVE MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE
FOUR-YEAR TERMS ON THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE.
(c) IN APPOINTING MEMBERS OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.5)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER
SHALL APPOINT A REPRESENTATIVE OF EACH CATEGORY OF LICENSE, IF ANY,
WHICH CATEGORY COLLECTIVELY PAID TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT OR MORE OF
THE TOTAL FEE REVENUE COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 80 DURING
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
(2.5) THE MEMBERS OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL RECEIVE
NO COMPENSATION OR REIMBURSEMENT FROM THE STATE OF COLORADO OR
THE DEPARTMENT FOR EXPENSES INCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR
DUTIES.
(3) In the event of a vacancy on the advisory committee prior to the
completion of a member's full term, the commissioner shall appoint a
person to complete the remainder of the term. The person shall represent the
same group as the member the person is replacing. pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section.
(4) (a) The initial appointments of the animal rescue representative,
the small animal breeder, the pet animal wholesaler, one member from the
general public, and the large-scale operation dog breeder shall expire on
January 1, 1995. The initial appointments of the bird breeder, the
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

representative of boarding kennels, the representative of animal control
officers, the small-scale operation dog breeder, and one member from the
general public shall expire on January 1, 1996. The initial appointment of
all other members shall be for a term of three years. Thereafter, members
of the advisory committee shall serve for terms of three years.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-80-108, amend
(1)(n) as follows:
35-80-108. Unlawful acts - short title - disclosure requirement
- definition - rules.
(1) Unless otherwise authorized by law, it is unlawful and a
violation of this article 80 for an individual or entity:
(n) To import or cause to be imported a dog or cat PET ANIMAL,
EXCLUDING A REPTILE, FISH, OR RODENT, for the purpose of sale by a pet
animal facility, unless the dog or cat PET ANIMAL has a VALID certificate of
veterinary health and, if the dog or cat is over six months old, proof of a
rabies vaccination; or INSPECTION BY AN ACCREDITED VETERINARIAN IN THE
STATE OF ORIGIN ISSUED WITHIN TEN DAYS PRIOR TO THE PET ANIMAL'S
ARRIVAL IN COLORADO. A PET ANIMAL FACILITY SHALL MEET ALL IMPORT
REQUIREMENTS AS DETERMINED BY THE STATE VETERINARIAN.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-80-105, amend (4)
as follows:
35-80-105. Pet animal facility - licensure requirements -
application - fees - rules.
(4) Each applicant for a pet animal facility license shall pay an
annual license fee in the amount specified by rule of the commissioner,
which amount shall not exceed seven hundred ONE THOUSAND FIVE
HUNDRED dollars per license.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-80-113, amend (1)
as follows:
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

35-80-113. Civil penalties.
(1) Any A person who THAT violates any provision of this article
ARTICLE 80 or any rule adopted pursuant to this article ARTICLE 80 is subject
to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner. The AMOUNT OF THE
maximum penalty shall MUST not exceed one thousand TWO THOUSAND FIVE
HUNDRED dollars per violation.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-80-111, amend
(2)(a) as follows:
35-80-111. Enforcement - cease-and-desist orders - hearings.
(2) (a) Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe
a violation of a provision of this article 80 or a rule adopted pursuant to this
article 80 has occurred and immediate enforcement is deemed necessary, the
commissioner may issue a cease-and-desist order, which may require a
person to cease violating a provision of this article 80 or a rule adopted
pursuant to this article 80 THE VIOLATION. The cease-and-desist order must
set forth the provisions alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to
have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all actions cease
forthwith. At any time after service of the order to cease and desist, The
person may request, at the person's discretion, a prompt hearing to
determine whether the violation occurred, WHICH REQUEST MUST BE MADE
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER ISSUANCE OF THE ORDER TO CEASE AND DESIST.
The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24 and shall be
conducted promptly.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-80-109, add (8) as
follows:
35-80-109. Powers and duties of commissioner - rules.
(8) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL DEVELOP AN ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCESS, NOT INCONSISTENT WITH SECTION 24-4-103 (7), FOR AN
INTERESTED PERSON TO PETITION FOR THE ISSUANCE, AMENDMENT, OR
REPEAL OF A RULE BY THE COMMISSIONER PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 80.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-80-108.5, amend
as added by House Bill 26-1011 (4)(b)(V) and (4)(b)(VI); and add
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

(4)(b)(VII) as follows:
35-80-108.5. Pet stores - brokers - exceptions - short title.
(4) (b) Subsection (4)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(V) The sale or transfer of a dog or cat by the original breeder of the
dog or cat; or
(VI) The sale, transfer, or adoption of a dog or cat by a
health-related research facility pursuant to section 35-82-102; OR
(VII) PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2028, THE SALE, TRANSFER, OR
ADOPTION OF A DOG OR CAT TO OR BY A PET STORE.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-3-234, amend
(4)(b) and (4)(c); and add with amended and relocated provisions (7) as
follows:
42-3-234. Special plates - adopt a shelter pet - pet
overpopulation authority - pet overpopulation fund - adopt a shelter
pet account - definitions.
(4) The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under
this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for
regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect
the following fees and donations:
(b) A one-time, thirty-dollar donation for issuance or replacement
of the license plate, which donation shall be transmitted to the state
treasurer, who shall credit the same to the adopt a shelter pet account in the
pet overpopulation fund created in section 35-80-116.5, C.R.S. SUBSECTION
(7)(f) OF THIS SECTION; and
(c) An annual twenty-five-dollar license plate renewal donation,
which donation shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit
the same to the adopt a shelter pet account in the pet overpopulation fund
created in section 35-80-116.5, C.R.S. SUBSECTION (7)(f) OF THIS SECTION;
except that the department and its authorized agents may retain the portion
of the donation necessary to offset implementing this paragraph (c)
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

SUBSECTION (4)(c), up to a maximum of two dollars.
(7) (a) [Formerly 35-80-116.5 (1)] There is hereby created the
Colorado pet overpopulation authority, also referred to in this section as the
"authority", which shall be IS a body corporate and a political subdivision
of the state. The authority is not an agency of state government and is not
subject to administrative direction by any state agency. except as provided
in this article.
(b) [Formerly 35-80-116.5 (2)] (a) (I) The powers of the Colorado
pet overpopulation authority are vested in a board of directors consisting of
the following:
(I) (A) One representative of the Animal Assistance Foundation or
its successor organization;
(II) (B) One representative of an animal shelter; as defined in
section 35-80-102 (1);
(III) (C) One representative of a state veterinary medical association;
(IV) (D) One representative of a Colorado animal control agency;
(V) (E) One representative from the department of agriculture;
(VI) (F) One member from a pet animal rescue; as defined in section
35-80-102 (11.2);
(VII) (G) One member of the general public who has an interest in
animal welfare who is not a member of a board of any animal welfare
organization;
(VIII) (H) One representative of MEMBER WHO IS FROM WESTERN
COLORADO AND REPRESENTS an animal shelter as defined in section
35-80-102 (1); OR a pet animal rescue as defined in section 35-80-102
(11.2); or IS a veterinary professional registered with the state board of
veterinary medicine; from western Colorado;
(IX) (I) One representative of MEMBER WHO IS FROM EASTERN
COLORADO AND REPRESENTS an animal shelter as defined in section
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

35-80-102 (1); OR a pet animal rescue as defined in section 35-80-102
(11.2); or IS a veterinary professional registered with the state board of
veterinary medicine; from eastern Colorado;
(X) (J) One representative of MEMBER WHO IS FROM SOUTHERN
COLORADO AND REPRESENTS an animal shelter as defined in section
35-80-102 (1); OR a pet animal rescue, as defined in section 35-80-102
(11.2); or IS a veterinary professional registered with the state board of
veterinary medicine; from southern Colorado; and
(XI) (K) One representative from a pet animal facility licensed and
in good standing pursuant to section 35-80-104 located in a county with a
population of fifty thousand or less.
(b) (II) The commissioner OF AGRICULTURE shall appoint the board
members to three-year terms; except that three of the members appointed
on September 1, 2001, shall serve an initial term of two years. Each member
shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and shall continue in office
until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. Initial members of
the authority shall be appointed no later than September 1, 2001.
(c) (III) On the expiration of the term of a member of the board, that
member's successor shall be appointed by the commissioner OF
AGRICULTURE for a term of three years; except that, in the case of a
vacancy, the commissioner shall appoint a person AN INDIVIDUAL who shall
serve for the unexpired term.
(c) [Formerly 35-80-116.5 (3)] (a) (I) Each board member shall
meet the following qualifications at the time of appointment and throughout
the member's term of office:
(I) (A) Residency in this state; and
(II) (B) Demonstration of an active interest in the education of the
community regarding the benefits of pet overpopulation control in
Colorado.
(b) (II) The commissioner OF AGRICULTURE shall immediately
declare the office of any member of the board vacant whenever the
commissioner finds that the member is not qualified under this subsection
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

(3) SUBSECTION (7)(c) or that the member is unable to perform the duties of
the office.
(c) (III) Members shall serve without compensation for any service
provided to the Colorado pet overpopulation authority. Members shall not
receive any reimbursement from the board for any expenses incurred
fulfilling their responsibilities pursuant to this section SUBSECTION (7).
(d) (IV) Except as provided in subsection (2)(a)(VII) SUBSECTION
(7)(b)(I)(G) of this section, a board member may be a member of a board
or subcommittee of a board of an animal welfare organization, but no more
than one member of the board may be on the board or subcommittee of the
board of the same animal welfare organization.
(e) (V) A member of the board shall recuse themself from any board
action or vote if they have a conflict of interest in relation to the board
action or vote, including any allocation of funding to the member made
pursuant to this section SUBSECTION (7).
(d) [Formerly 35-80-116.5 (4)] The board may:
(a) (I) Adopt an education program concerning pet overpopulation
with emphasis on the importance of spaying and neutering to control pet
overpopulation;
(b) (II) Develop, adopt, and implement a process to fund and expend
moneys MONEY for the activities and responsibilities of the board. Funding
for the board includes the moneys MONEY available in the pet
overpopulation fund. created in subsection (5) of this section.
(c) (III) Accept gifts, grants, and donations, including personal
services, for the activities and responsibilities of the board. Any gift, grant,
or donation other than personal services shall be deposited into the pet
overpopulation fund. created in subsection (5) of this section.
(d) (IV) Develop, adopt, and implement a cooperative process to
work with local veterinarians, licensed animal shelters, and local
communities concerning animal sheltering and pet overpopulation control
in this state.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

(e) [Formerly 35-80-116.5 (4.5)] The board shall annually publish
on the pet overpopulation fund website the name of each grantee receiving
money from the pet overpopulation fund, the amount of each grant provided
to a grantee, when a grantee received a grant, and the names of each board
member.
(f) [Formerly 35-80-116.5 (5)] (a) (I) Donations collected pursuant
to subsection (4) SUBSECTION (7)(d) of this section and section 39-22-2201
C.R.S., shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the pet
overpopulation fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. All
interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys MONEY in the
fund shall be IS credited to the fund.
(b) (II) All unexpended and unencumbered moneys MONEY
remaining in the fund at the end of any STATE fiscal year shall remain
REMAINS in the fund, and DOES not revert back to the general fund or any
other fund, or AND SHALL NOT be used for any purpose other than the
purposes set forth in this section SUBSECTION (7). Such moneys shall be
MONEY IS appropriated continually to the state treasurer, who shall transfer
all available moneys MONEY in the pet overpopulation fund to the pet
overpopulation authority at least quarterly unless the board expressly
requests otherwise. The board shall expend moneys MONEY from the pet
overpopulation fund for the implementation of this section SUBSECTION (7).
(c) (III) When expending funds MONEY to implement this section
SUBSECTION (7), the Colorado pet overpopulation authority shall give
priority to the areas that have an insufficient number of pet animal
veterinary resources to adequately meet local needs.
(c.5) (IV) At least seventy percent of the money annually awarded
for all grants that are funded by the pet overpopulation fund must be
annually allocated for rural community facilities. The board shall consider
awarding at least fifty percent of the funds MONEY designated for rural
community facilities to counties with a population of fifty thousand or less.
(d) (V) There is hereby created in the pet overpopulation fund the
adopt a shelter pet account, which consists of moneys MONEY donated to
qualify for the adopt a shelter pet special license plate pursuant to section
42-3-234, C.R.S. THIS SECTION.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

(e) (I) (VI) (A) The authority shall use the money in the adopt a
shelter pet account to support the spaying and neutering and other medical
costs of animals in animal shelters and rescues, to support overpopulation
education programs, and to support the trap-neuter-return established in
subsection (9)(b) SUBSECTION (7)(j)(II) of this section; except that up to ten
percent of the money in the adopt a shelter pet account may be used for the
administration of the account.
(II) (B) The authority must SHALL not favor a particular shelter
model when allocating money from the adopt a shelter pet account.
(g) [Formerly 35-80-116.5 (6)] Except as provided in section
42-3-234, C.R.S. THIS SUBSECTION (7), the Colorado pet overpopulation
authority created pursuant to this section, shall not be funded by or through
any state agency.
(h) [Formerly 35-80-116.5 (7)] Nothing in this section SUBSECTION
(7) shall be construed to authorize the Colorado pet overpopulation
authority to promulgate ADOPT rules to implement this section SUBSECTION
(7).
(i) [Formerly 35-80-116.5 (8)] A pet animal facility applying for a
grant described in subsection (9)(b) SUBSECTION (7)(j)(II) of this section
from the adopt a shelter pet account must be licensed and in good standing
pursuant to section 35-80-104.
(j) [Formerly 35-80-116.5 (9)] (a) (I) As used in this section
SUBSECTION (7), unless the context otherwise requires:
(I) (A) "Animal welfare facility" means a pet animal facility, as
defined in section 35-80-102 (11); a pet animal rescue, as defined in section
35-80-102 (11.2); or a spay and neuter organization. as defined in
subsection (9)(a)(V) of this section.
(B) "ANIMAL SHELTER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
35-80-102 (1).
(C) "AUTHORITY" MEANS THE COLORADO PET OVERPOPULATION
AUTHORITY CREATED IN SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

(II) (D) "Community cat" means a free-roaming domestic cat that
may have a caretaker and is not socialized to humans.
(III) (E) "Ear-tipping" means the removal of approximately one
quarter of a community cat's left ear while under anesthesia, which serves
as a visual indicator of sterilization.
(F) "FUND" MEANS THE PET OVERPOPULATION FUND CREATED IN
SUBSECTION (7)(f)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) "PET ANIMAL RESCUE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
35-80-102 (11.2).
(IV) (H) "Rural community facility" means an animal welfare
facility that is located in a Colorado county with a population of two
hundred thousand or less.
(V) (I) "Spay and neuter organization" means a nonprofit
organization primarily offering spay and neuter services performed by a
licensed veterinarian, as defined in section 35-80-102 (8.7).
(VI) (J) "Trap-neuter-return" means a nonlethal process of humanely
trapping, sterilizing, vaccinating for rabies, ear-tipping, and returning
community cats to their habitats COMMUNITY CATS.
(b) (II) The authority shall establish a trap-neuter-return funded by
the adopt a shelter pet account. The authority may award money from the
adopt a shelter pet account to animal welfare facilities located in Colorado
to implement trap-neuter-return for the purposes described in subsection
(9)(c) SUBSECTION (7)(j)(III) of this section.
(c) (III) An animal welfare facility awarded money for the
trap-neuter-return is authorized to spend the money only on:
(I) (A) Trapping, sterilizing, vaccinating, and ear-tipping community
cats in Colorado;
(II) (B) Veterinary care for the treatment and sterilization of
community cats in Colorado;
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

(III) (C) Training for community cat caretakers and animal control
personnel in humane trapping and trap-neuter-return protocols in Colorado;
and
(IV) (D) For An animal welfare facility that is a spay and neuter
organization, veterinary materials and support for mobile clinics in
Colorado.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-80-102, amend
(6.6) and (6.7) as follows:
35-80-102. Definitions - repeal.
As used in this article 80, unless the context otherwise requires:
(6.6) (a) "Dog breeder, large scale operation" or "large scale
operation dog breeder" means a dog breeder that transfers at least one
hundred dogs per year.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (6.6) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2028.
(6.7) (a) "Dog breeder, small scale operation" or "small scale
operation dog breeder" means a dog breeder that transfers more than the
number of dogs permitted for a canine hobby breeder facility but no more
than ninety-nine dogs per year.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (6.7) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2028.
SECTION 12. Repeal of relocated provisions in this act. In
Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 35-80-116.5.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 39-22-2201
as follows:
39-22-2201. Voluntary contribution designation - procedure.
For income tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2010, the
Colorado state individual income tax return form must contain a line
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

whereby each individual taxpayer may designate the amount of the
contribution, if any, the taxpayer wishes to make to the pet overpopulation
fund created in section 35-80-116.5 (5) SECTION 42-3-234 (7)(f).
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 39-22-2202
as follows:
39-22-2202. Contributions credited to the fund - administration
- transfer.
The department of revenue shall determine annually the total amount
designated pursuant to section 39-22-2201 and shall report the amount to
the state treasurer, who shall credit such amount to the pet overpopulation
fund created in section 35-80-116.5 (5), C.R.S. SECTION 42-3-234 (7)(f).
The general assembly shall appropriate annually from the pet
overpopulation fund to the department the department's costs of
administering the moneys MONEY designated as contributions to the fund.
After subtracting the appropriation to the department, all designated moneys
MONEY in the fund are hereby IS continuously appropriated for the purposes
of this part 22. At the end of each STATE fiscal year, the state treasurer shall
transfer all designated moneys MONEY in the fund and all interest earned
through the investment of fund moneys MONEY, after subtracting the
appropriation to the department, as specified in section 35-80-116.5 (5)(b),
C.R.S. SECTION 42-3-234 (7)(f)(II).
SECTION 15. Act subject to petition - effective date. (1) Except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this act takes effect at 12:01
a.m. on the day following the expiration of the ninety-day period after final
adjournment of the general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine
die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed
pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this act
or an item, section, or part of this act within such period, then the act, item,
section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people at the
general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take
effect on the date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the
governor.
(2) Section 35-80-108.5, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1183

section 9 of this act, takes effect only if House Bill 26-1011 becomes law,
in which case section 35-80-108.5, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended
in section 9 of this act, takes effect on the applicable effective date of this
act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1183